Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 3 REGULATION OF RATES AND CHARGES
40-3-117. Performance-based rate-making - investigation - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3306, § 11, effective May 30.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective September 1, 2021. (See L. 2019, p. 3306.)

40-3-118. Electric utility retail rates survey - nonadjudicatory proceeding - definition - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3306, § 11, effective May 30.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective September 1, 2021. (See L. 2019, p. 3306.)

40-3-119. Measurement of use for billing - rules.

After January 1, 2023, an investor-owned gas utility, at its discretion, may apply to the commission for approval to measure the amount of use for billing purposes in either fuel commodity units or for energy services provided. Upon receipt of the utility's application, the commission shall approve, deny, or modify the utility's application for measurement of use for billing purposes pursuant to this section.

Source: L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-051), ch. 333, p. 2359, § 5, effective August 10.